Wisconsin, session 2025, SB215.
do enact as follows:SB215,1Section 1. 60.10 (1) (b) 2m. of the statutes is amended to read:60.10 (1) (b) 2m. In a town with a population of 2,500 or more, provide Provide for the appointment by the town board of the town clerk, town treasurer, or both, or of the combined office of town clerk and town treasurer under s. 60.305 (1), at a level of compensation to be set by the board that may not be reduced during the term to which the person is appointed.SB215,2Section 2. 60.30 (1e) (f) of the statutes is amended to read:60.30 (1e) (f) If Subject to s. 60.305 (4) (a), if a person is appointed to office under par. (e), the person initially appointed may not take office until the term of office of the incumbent town clerk, town treasurer, or combined town clerk and town treasurer expires there is a vacancy in that position, as described under s. 17.03. A person appointed to the office of town clerk or town treasurer, or to the combined office of town clerk and town treasurer, shall serve for a term, not to exceed 3 years, that is set by the town board. The person may be reappointed and may be dismissed by the board only for cause, as defined in s. 17.001.SB215,3Section 3. 60.305 (4) (a) of the statutes is renumbered 60.305 (4) (a) 1. and amended to read:60.305 (4) (a) 1. A Subject to subd. 2., a combination of offices under this section takes effect on the latest date that any current term of an office to be combined expires.SB215,4Section 4. 60.305 (4) (a) 2. of the statutes is created to read:60.305 (4) (a) 2. The town board may provide that a combination of offices under this section takes effect immediately as both positions become vacant, as set forth in s. 17.03, or, if the person appointed to the combined office holds one of the offices to be combined, immediately upon a vacancy in the other office to be combined.SB215,5Section 5. 60.331 of the statutes is amended to read:60.331 Deputy town clerk. Each town clerk may appoint one or more deputies for whom the town clerk is responsible. A deputy shall take and file the official oath and bond under s. 60.31. The town clerk may designate a deputy to shall perform the clerk’s duties during the absence, sickness or other disability upon direction of the clerk or upon inability of the clerk to perform the clerk’s duties. A deputy town clerk need not be a resident of the town.SB215,6Section 6. 60.341 of the statutes is amended to read:60.341 Deputy town treasurer. Each town treasurer may appoint a deputy one or more deputies for whom the treasurer is responsible. The A deputy shall take and file the official oath and bond under s. 60.31. In case of the absence, sickness or other disability of the treasurer, the The deputy shall perform the treasurer’s duties upon direction of the treasurer or upon inability of the treasurer to perform the treasurer’s duties. A deputy town treasurer need not be a resident of the town.SB215,7Section 7. 65.90 (3) (a) 1. of the statutes is repealed.SB215,8Section 8. 82.19 (2) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:82.19 (2) (a) Every highway shall cease to be a public highway 4 years from the date on which it was laid out, except the parts of the highway that have been opened, traveled, or worked within that time. Down Down /2025/related/enrolled/sb215 true enrolledbills /2025/related/enrolled/sb215 enrolledbills/2025/REG/SB215 enrolledbills/2025/REG/SB215 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Enrolled Legislation»SB215: Text as Enrolled × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting